Louisiana, session 2026, SB45.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 40:2183.1 is hereby enacted to read as follows:
§2183.1. Exemption from licensure; gratuitous care
A. The licensure requirements provided for in this Part and R.S.
40:2120.1 et seq., relative to licensure of home- and community-based service
providers, shall not apply to a nonprofit organization that provides gratuitous
end-of-life care to terminally ill patients in a home-like setting if the
organization meets all of the following criteria:
(1) Provides accommodations and services at no cost to the patient or the
patient's family.
(2) Does not receive any payments from Medicare, Medicaid, or any
other public or private health insurance.
(3) Provides individual private bedrooms for no more than three patients
at a time at any single location owned or operated by the nonprofit
organization.
B. Any organization that satisfies the criteria provided in Subsection A
of this Section shall be treated as the patient's place of residence for purposes
of home hospice care.
C. Any medication prescribed for the patient in accordance with the
patient's plan of care shall be delivered, stored, and administered in the same
manner as if the patient was in a home setting.
D. The patient's licensed hospice provider shall prepare and manage the
Page 1 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.

SB NO. 45 ENROLLED
patient's plan of care.
E. An individual designated by the organization as the patient's caregiver
may perform any delegated tasks in the same manner as a family member
serving as a caregiver in a home setting. An individual's licensing credentials
shall not prevent the individual from performing tasks in a caregiver capacity.
A licensed healthcare professional may delegate tasks to an individual serving
as a caregiver in accordance with the patient's plan of care. A licensed
healthcare professional who delegates caregiver tasks in accordance with the
provisions of this Section and who is acting in good faith and with reasonable
care shall be immune from disciplinary or adverse administrative actions from
the individual's respective licensing board.
Section 2. This Act shall become effective upon signature by the governor or, if not
signed by the governor, upon expiration of the time for bills to become law without signature
by the governor, as provided by Article III, Section 18 of the Constitution of Louisiana. If
vetoed by the governor and subsequently approved by the legislature, this Act shall become
effective on the day following such approval.
PRESIDENT OF THE SENATE
SPEAKER OF THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF LOUISIANA
APPROVED:
Page 2 of 2
Coding: Words which are struck through are deletions from existing law;
words in boldface type and underscored are additions.